Louisiana, session 2026, HB575.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:330(B)(4) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§330. Responsibility for property; bond for property manager; trade-ins for higher
education boards and institutions and vocational-technical schools
* * *
B.
* * *
(4)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (3) of this Subsection
relative to surplus computer equipment, first preference in the acquisition of surplus
computer equipment authorized for disposition shall be given to public elementary
and secondary schools in the state, and community and technical colleges under the
management and control of the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana Community and
Technical Colleges.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (3) of this Subsection
relative to surplus vehicles, first preference in the acquisition of surplus vehicles
authorized for disposition shall be given to persons who are eligible for and are
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 575 ENROLLED
participating in the extended foster care program established pursuant to R.S.
46:288.1 et seq.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.